bg-BG: Конфигурация за монтаж на двигателя: Ремъчно задвижване; Верижно задвижване; Фрикционно задвижване; Мотор в главината (предно колело); Мотор в главината (задно колело); Централно задвижване; Друго/универсално; Друго
ja: モーターマウント構造: ベルトドライブ; チェーンドライブ; フリクションドライブ; ハブモーター (前輪); ハブモーター (後輪); ミッドドライブ; その他/ユニバーサル; その他
lt-LT: Variklio tvirtinimo konfigūracija: Diržinė pavara; Grandininė pavara; Frikcinė pavara; Stebulės variklis (priekinis ratas); Stebulės variklis (galinis ratas); Centrinė pavara; Kita / universalus; Kita
zh-CN: 电机安装配置: 皮带传动; 链条传动; 摩擦传动; 轮毂电机（前轮）; 轮毂电机（后轮）; 中置驱动; 其他/通用; 其他
hu: Motor rögzítési konfiguráció: Szíjhajtás; Lánchajtás; Dörzshajtás; Agy motor (első kerék); Agy motor (hátsó kerék); Középmotor; Egyéb/univerzális; Egyéb
pt-BR: Configuração de montagem do motor: Transmissão por correia; Transmissão por corrente; Transmissão por atrito; Motor de cubo (roda dianteira); Motor de cubo (roda traseira); Motor central (mid-drive); Outro/Universal; Outra
it: Configurazione di montaggio del motore: Trasmissione a cinghia; Trasmissione a catena; Trasmissione a frizione; Motore nel mozzo (ruota anteriore); Motore nel mozzo (ruota posteriore); Motore centrale; Altro/Universale; Altro
vi: Cấu hình giá lắp động cơ: Dẫn động bằng dây đai; Dẫn động bằng dây xích; Dẫn động ma sát; Động cơ trung tâm (bánh trước); Động cơ trung tâm (bánh sau); Động cơ đặt giữa; Khác/Phổ thông; Khác
el: Διαμόρφωση τοποθέτησης κινητήρα: Μετάδοση με ιμάντα; Μετάδοση με αλυσίδα; Μετάδοση με τριβή; Κινητήρας πλήμνης (μπροστινός τροχός); Κινητήρας πλήμνης (πίσω τροχός); Κεντρικής μετάδοσης (Mid-drive); Άλλο/Γενικής χρήσης; Άλλο
en: Motor mounting configuration: Belt drive; Chain drive; Friction drive; Hub motor (front wheel); Hub motor (rear wheel); Mid-drive; Other/Universal; Other
pl: Konfiguracja mocowania silnika: Napęd pasowy; Napęd łańcuchowy; Napęd cierny; Silnik w piaście (przednie koło); Silnik w piaście (tylne koło); Napęd centralny; Inny/Uniwersalny; Inny
nb: Monteringskonfigurasjon for motor: Remdrift; Kjededrift; Friksjonsdrift; Navmotor (forhjul); Navmotor (bakhjul); Midtmontert motor; Annet/universell; Annet
th: การกำหนดค่าการติดตั้งมอเตอร์: ขับเคลื่อนด้วยสายพาน; ขับเคลื่อนด้วยโซ่; ขับเคลื่อนด้วยแรงเสียดทาน; มอเตอร์ดุมล้อ (ล้อหน้า); มอเตอร์ดุมล้อ (ล้อหลัง); มอเตอร์กลาง; อื่นๆ/อเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Configuração de montagem do motor: Transmissão por correia; Transmissão por corrente; Transmissão por fricção; Motor de cubo (roda dianteira); Motor de cubo (roda traseira); Motor central; Outro/Universal; Outro
es: Configuración de montaje del motor: Transmisión por correa; Transmisión por cadena; Transmisión por fricción; Motor de cubo (rueda delantera); Motor de cubo (rueda trasera); Motor central; Otro/Universal; Otro
fi: Moottorin asennuskokoonpano: Hihnaveto; Ketjuveto; Kitkaveto; Napamoottori (etupyörä); Napamoottori (takapyörä); Keskimoottori; Muu/yleismalli; Muu
de: Montagekonfiguration des Motors: Riemenantrieb; Kettenantrieb; Reibradantrieb; Nabenmotor (Vorderrad); Nabenmotor (Hinterrad); Mittelmotor; Sonstige/Universal; Sonstige
sk-SK: Konfigurácia upvenenia motora: Remeňový pohon; Reťazový pohon; Trecia spojka (Trecí pohon); Nábojový motor (predné koleso); Nábojový motor (zadné koleso); Stredový pohon; Iné/univerzálne; Iné
cs: Uspořádání uchycení motoru: Řemenový pohon; Řetězový pohon; Třecí pohon; Motor v náboji (přední kolo); Motor v náboji (zadní kolo); Středový pohon; Jiné/univerzální; Jiné
hr-HR: Konfiguracija montaže motora: Remenski pogon; Lančani pogon; Frikcijski pogon; Motor u glavčini (prednji kotač); Motor u glavčini (stražnji kotač); Srednji pogon; Ostalo / univerzalno; Ostalo
ro-RO: Configurație de montare a motorului: Transmisie pe curea; Transmisie pe lanț; Transmisie prin frecare; Motor în butuc (roata din față); Motor în butuc (roata din spate); Montat central; Altele/universal; Altele
sl-SI: Konfiguracija nosilcev motorja: Jermenski pogon; Verižni pogon; Torni pogon; Motor v pestu (sprednje kolo); Motor v pestu (zadnje kolo); Sredinski pogon; Drugo/univerzalno; Drugo
zh-TW: 馬達安裝配置: 皮帶傳動; 鏈條傳動; 摩擦傳動; 輪轂馬達 (前輪); 輪轂馬達 (後輪); 中置驅動; 其他/通用; 其他
da: Monteringskonfiguration af motormontering: Remtræk; Kædetræk; Friktionstræk; Navmotor (forhjul); Navmotor (baghjul); Centermotor; Andet/universal; Andet
sv: Utformning av motorfäste: Remdrift; Kedjedrift; Friktionsdrift; Navmotor (framhjul); Navmotor (bakhjul); Mittmonterad; Annan/universell; Annan
fr: Configuration de montage du moteur: Entraînement par courroie; Entraînement par chaîne; Entraînement par friction; Moteur moyeu (roue avant); Moteur moyeu (roue arrière); Moteur central; Autre/universel; Autre
tr: Motor montaj konfigürasyonu: Kayış tahrikli; Zincir tahrikli; Sürtünme tahrikli; Tekerlek göbeği motoru (ön tekerlek); Tekerlek göbeği motoru (arka tekerlek); Orta tahrikli; Diğer/Evrensel; Diğer
nl: Montageconfiguratie motor: Riemaandrijving; Kettingaandrijving; Wrijvingsaandrijving; Naafmotor (voorwiel); Naafmotor (achterwiel); Middenaandrijving; Overig/universeel; Overig
ru: Конфигурация крепления двигателя: Ременной привод; Цепной привод; Фрикционный привод; Мотор-колесо (переднее); Мотор-колесо (заднее); Центральный мотор (кареточный); Другое/универсальное; Другое
ko: 모터 장착 구성: 벨트 드라이브; 체인 드라이브; 마찰 구동; 허브 모터(앞바퀴); 허브 모터(뒷바퀴); 미드 드라이브; 기타/유니버설; 기타